Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1243
Oral examination, defined.

An oral examination is an examination in the presence of the jury or tribunal which is to decide the fact or act upon it, the testimony being heard by the jury or tribunal from the lips of the witness.

R.S.1867, Code § 369, p. 455;

R.S.1913, § 7935;

C.S.1922, § 8877;

C.S.1929, § 20-1243;

R.S.1943, § 25-1243.

The unsupported assertions of attorneys during court proceedings do not establish the facts asserted unless the other appropriate parties stipulate to such facts. Schroeder v. Barnes, 5 Neb. App. 811, 565 N.W.2d 749 (1997).